Utah statutes.
32A-12-301 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Operating without a license or permit.
(1) (a)  A person may not operate the following businesses without first
obtaining a license under this title if the business allows a person described
in Subsection (1)(b) to purchase or consume an alcoholic beverage on the
premises of the business:
(i)  a restaurant;
(ii)  an airport lounge;
(iii)  a club license;
(iv)  a resort;
(v)  an on-premise beer retailer outlet;
(vi)  on-premise banquet premises; or
(vii)  a business similar to one listed in Subsections (1)(a)(i) through (vi).
(b)  Subsection (1)(a) applies if one of the following is allowed to purchase
or consume an alcoholic beverage on the premises of the business:
(i)  a patron;
(ii)  a customer;
(iii)  a member;
(iv)  a guest;
(v)  a resident of a resort;
(vi)  a holder of a customer card under Chapter 4a, Part 3, Resort Spa
Sublicense; or
(vii)  an invitee.
(2)  A person conducting an event or function that is open to the general
public may not directly or indirectly sell, offer to sell, or otherwise
furnish an alcoholic beverage to a person attending the event or function
without first obtaining a permit under this title.
(3)  A person conducting a privately hosted event or private social function
may not directly or indirectly sell or offer to sell an alcoholic beverage to
a person attending the privately hosted event or private social function
without first obtaining a permit under this title.
(4)  A person may not operate the following businesses without first obtaining
a license under this title:
(a)  a winery manufacturer;
(b)  a distillery manufacturer;
(c)  a brewery manufacturer;
(d)  a local industry representative of:
(i)  a manufacturer of an alcoholic beverage;
(ii)  a supplier of an alcoholic beverage; or
(iii)  an importer of an alcoholic beverage;
(e)  a liquor warehouser; or
(f)  a beer wholesaler.
(5)  A person may not operate a public conveyance in this state without first
obtaining a public service permit under this title if that public conveyance
allows a person to purchase or consume an alcoholic beverage or alcoholic
product:
(a)  on the public conveyance; or
(b)  on the premises of a hospitality room located with a depot, terminal, or
similar facility at which a service is provided to a patron of the public
conveyance.
